Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.911

Effective dates—1987 c 387.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1987, except section 10 of this act which shall take effect immediately.

[ 1987 c 387 s 11.]